Indiana, session 2026, HB1204.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-8-2-87.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 87.8. "Fees", for purposes of IC 14-19-3-6, means
entrance or admission fees that are paid in a county upon or after
entering an Indiana state park or state recreation area located in
the county.
SECTION 2. IC 14-8-2-225.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 225.6. "Public safety", for
purposes of IC 14-19-3-6, has the meaning set forth in
IC 6-3.6-2-14.
SECTION 3. IC 14-19-3-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The general assembly finds the following:
(1) Counties in which a significant amount of land is owned by
the state or federal government, or in which a reservoir is
located, experience a unique loss of tax revenue for use in
HB 1204—LS 6295/DI 150


providing government services such as public safety and
maintaining the drinking water supply.
(2) A unique approach is required to ensure that the counties
receive additional revenue to pay for public safety and to
address reservoir water quality issues for those who use the
reservoir as both a source of drinking water and recreation.
(3) The additional revenue collected through a local ordinance
by a county benefits the health and welfare of the people and
is of public utility and benefit.
(4) The influx of visitors to the federal and state lands creates
additional financial costs for counties, including additional
burdens on law enforcement and infrastructure.
(b) This section applies to a county in which the department
collects an entrance fee for entry into a state park or state
recreation area.
(c) A county fiscal body may adopt an ordinance to impose a
surcharge on the fees paid in the county for entry into a state park
or state recreation area located in the county. A county fiscal body
that adopts an ordinance under this section shall notify the director
of the department. The department shall report the surcharge
collected under the ordinance on forms approved by the county
treasurer.
(d) The surcharge is equal to an amount of not more than one
dollar ($1) in addition to the fees charged by the department for
entry into the state park or state recreation area. However, the
surcharge may not be imposed on a person who holds an annual
pass issued under section 5 of this chapter.
(e) The department shall:
(1) begin collecting the surcharge not later than sixty (60)
days after receiving notice under subsection (c) of the
adoption of an ordinance; and
(2) subject to subsection (f), pay the surcharge collected
during a month to the county treasurer not later than the end
of the following month.
(f) If:
(1) the state park or state recreation area is located in more
than one (1) county; and
(2) each county in which the state park or state recreation
area is located has passed an ordinance under subsection (c);
the department shall prorate the surcharge and pay a prorated
share to the county treasurer for each county in which the state
park or state recreation area is located.
HB 1204—LS 6295/DI 150


(g) The surcharge collected by the department and paid to the
county treasurer must, as applicable, be used for one (1) or both of
the following in accordance with an ordinance adopted under
subsection (c):
(1) Public safety.
(2) Infrastructure, including water quality improvements,
that is:
(A) impacted by tourism; or
(B) for the benefit of tourism.
HB 1204—LS 6295/DI 150


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Natural Resources, to which was
referred House Bill 1204, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1204 as introduced.)
LINDAUER
Committee Vote: Yeas 12, Nays 0
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Ways and Means, to which was
referred House Bill 1204, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1204 as printed January 14, 2026.)
THOMPSON
Committee Vote: Yeas 23, Nays 0
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1204 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 3, delete lines 1 through 6, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(g) The surcharge collected by the department and paid to the
county treasurer must, as applicable, be used for one (1) or both of
the following in accordance with an ordinance adopted under
subsection (c):
(1) Public safety.
(2) Infrastructure, including water quality improvements,
that is:
(A) impacted by tourism; or
(B) for the benefit of tourism.".
(Reference is to HB 1204 as printed January 27, 2026.)
HALL
HB 1204—LS 6295/DI 150